Idaho, session 2025, S1215.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. COMMUNITY-BASED RECOVERY CENTERS. Of the moneys appro-
priated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Substance Abuse
Treatment and Prevention Program from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund in
Section 1 of Senate Bill No. 1108 as enacted by the First Regular Session of
the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, $1,350,000 shall be distributed for the
purpose of continued funding to eligible community-based recovery centers.
"Community-based recovery center" means a not-for-profit organization with
an oversight advisory board and a verifiable physical location where sup-
port services are provided to Idahoans at no cost or at very limited cost
based on ability to pay, that operates at least twenty-five (25) consistent
hours each week, and that has sufficient square footage for walk-in visits
and group activities for recovery support. Services provided may include
peer-to-peer support, job training, recovery support to reduce substance
use, recovery coaching, and references to other community-based recovery
services. Funds shall be used by the community-based recovery centers to
support the operations of the center, including but not limited to per-
sonnel costs, rent or lease expenses, basic supplies, and other operating
costs. Community-based recovery centers shall provide to the Department
of Health and Welfare a document that demonstrates operational and fiscal
accountability for the center. Community-based recovery centers shall work
in partnership with the Department of Health and Welfare and sign an at-


testation letter or equivalent document that ensures funds will be used in
accordance with this section, with Section 2 of this act, and with any other
applicable rule or law, and that all moneys received will be accounted for
using generally accepted accounting principles. Funding is allocated for
eligible centers for the cities of Boise, Caldwell or Nampa, Emmett, Twin
Falls, Idaho Falls, Pocatello, Moscow, Lewiston, and Coeur d'Alene.
SECTION 2. COMMUNITY-BASED RECOVERY CENTERS OVERSIGHT. (1) The De-
partment of Health and Welfare shall provide oversight for the appropriated
funds provided in Section 1 of this act for community-based recovery cen-
ters. The Department of Health and Welfare shall:
(a) Provide four distributions of $37,500 for a total distribution of
$150,000 to each eligible center. Distributions shall occur no later
than July 15, 2025, October 15, 2025, January 15, 2026, and April 15,
2026;
(b) Receive and compile two reports from each center and transmit each
report to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office on behalf of the Joint Millennium Fund Committee by
December 30, 2025, and by June 30, 2026, or as soon thereafter as is
practicable. The format of the report and the content therein shall be
developed by the department and approved by the Budget and Policy Analy-
sis Division of the Legislative Services Office;
(c) Withhold or recover distributions pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection if the center is not operating or has indicated it intends to
no longer operate prior to the close of the fiscal year, if it does not
provide any of the required reports, or otherwise as needed to address
legal or fiscal concerns regarding funds provided to a center. The
department shall notify the center immediately with detailed informa-
tion on identified concerns and potential amounts subject to recovery.
Amounts subject to withholding or recovery shall be based on the time
frame in question; and
(d) Assist each center, as needed, to ensure services are being pro-
vided as intended by this act and to meet the needs of that local commu-
nity.
(2) The Department of Health and Welfare shall not have the authority to
directly manage any center or direct any center to perform functions not re-
quired in this section or Section 1 of this act. If the Department of Health
and Welfare has reason to believe that appropriated funds are used in viola-
tion of this section or Section 1 of this act or any other rule or law, the
department shall immediately notify the center in question, the Budget and
Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office, and the Execu-
tive Office of the Governor of any misuse or perceived misuse of funds. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall work collaboratively with such cen-
ter and the Executive Office of the Governor to develop an appropriate cor-
rective action plan. If funds were withheld pursuant to Subsection (1)(c)
of this Section while a center made necessary adjustments according to the
corrective action plan and the center continued operations according to the
provisions of this act, then the department shall provide any withheld fund-
ing no later than 30 days upon completion of the corrective action plan.


(3) Should any of the community-based recovery centers as defined in
Section 1 of this act cease to operate or not be operational in accordance
with the requirements of this section and Section 1 of this act within 30 days
of any quarterly distribution date identified in this Section, the State
Controller, at the request of the Department of Health and Welfare, shall
transfer any quarterly distribution moneys back to the Idaho Millennium
Income Fund as soon as practicable. If a delay occurs as a result of action
or inaction by the Department of Health and Welfare, funds shall be retained
until such time that a payment can be made to an eligible center or it can
be determined that a center will no longer be able to operate. A decision
to no longer operate requires agreement from the identified center, the De-
partment of Health and Welfare, and the Executive Office of the Governor. If
a resolution is not reached by the end of the fiscal year, all moneys shall
be returned to the Idaho Millennium Income Fund and adequate documentation
shall be independently provided by the center and the Department of Health
and Welfare to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office no later than 30 days after the end of the fiscal year docu-
menting why a resolution could not be reached.
SECTION 3. ESTABLISHING A NEW COMMUNITY-BASED RECOVERY CENTER. (1) If
any of the nine cities identified in Section 1 of this act does not have an
approved center by no later than 14 days after a payment date identified in
Section 2 of this act and it does not appear that a previously existing center
for that city will be operational with the conditions set forth in this act,
the Department of Health and Welfare shall allow eligible organizations to
apply through a competitive application process. The Department of Health
and Welfare, a representative from that city's regional behavioral health
board or representative from the Executive Office of the Governor if a re-
gional behavioral health board is not operational, and a representative from
that city's regional public health district shall review each application
and select the most qualified organization to operate a community-based re-
covery center for that city. The Department of Health and Welfare shall im-
mediately notify the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office of the selected organization chosen to operate the center.
Funds may be provided to a new center if it is selected and operational within
45 days after a distribution date provided for in Section 2 of this act. If
a center is not operational within 45 days, then funds related to that quar-
terly distribution shall be transferred back to the Idaho Millennium Income
Fund by the State Controller as soon as practicable at the request of the De-
partment of Health and Welfare. Should a qualified applicant not be selected
to operate the center, then all appropriated funds that are allocated for
that center shall be transferred back to the Idaho Millennium Income Fund by
the State Controller at the request of the Department of Health and Welfare
no later than 30 days after the date identified for the fourth quarterly dis-
tribution.
(2) If the Department of Health and Welfare has received interest to es-
tablish an additional center or replace one of the current nine regional cen-
ters due to a lack of qualified options, the department shall make an offi-
cial request to the Idaho Legislature by including an enhancement request in
its fiscal year 2027 budget request submitted to the Legislature and the Gov-


ernor. A formal presentation shall be made to the Joint Legislative Millen-
nium Fund Committee and, if needed, the Joint Finance-Appropriations Com-
mittee.
SECTION 4. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Police for the Director's
Office Program $500,000 from the State-Directed Opioid Settlement Fund to
be expended for operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Police for the Patrol Program
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated expense
classes from the Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $110,000
Operating Expenditures 100,000
TOTAL $210,000
SECTION 6. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for the
Student Services Program $3,500,000 from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund
to be expended for trustee and benefit payments for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 7. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Juvenile Corrections for
the Community, Operations, and Program Services Program $2,500,000 from the
Idaho Millennium Income Fund to be expended for trustee and benefit payments
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 8. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to Idaho Public Television $50,000 from the
Idaho Millennium Income Fund to be expended for personnel costs for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to Idaho Public Television is hereby reduced by
$50,000 for operating expenditures from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 10. AFTER-SCHOOL PROGRAMS. Of the moneys appropriated for the
State Department of Education in Section 6 of this act for after-school pro-
grams, moneys distributed by the department shall be expended by a school
district or public charter school for after-school programs that provide ed-
ucation on the prevention and cessation for the use of tobacco, alcohol, and
other substances. All programs must comply with Section 33-201, Idaho Code,
regarding age compliance for programs offered.


SECTION 11. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Department of Juvenile Corrections for the Community, Operations, and
Program Services Program any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropri-
ated to the Department of Juvenile Corrections from the Idaho Millennium In-
come Fund for youth assessment centers for fiscal year 2025, in an amount not
to exceed $1,291,000 from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund to be used for
nonrecurring expenditures related to youth assessment centers for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller
shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and pro-
gram, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappro-
priation authorized herein.
SECTION 12. USES OF THE IDAHO MILLENNIUM INCOME FUND. The Joint Millen-
nium Fund Committee, pursuant to Section 67-1808(6), Idaho Code, recommends
that all moneys available for appropriation from the Idaho Millennium Income
Fund beginning in fiscal year 2024 and each year thereafter be prioritized
for programs that focus on prevention, cessation, and treatment related to
tobacco, vape, alcohol, illegal substances, and other substances that may be
abused beyond the intended uses and for the overall safety and well-being of
Idaho youth. Funding should be prioritized first to programs that benefit
Idahoans under 18 years of age and then for adults with higher risk factors
for abusing or using various substances described in this section. It is the
recommendation of the Joint Millennium Fund Committee that no moneys from
the Idaho Millennium Income Fund be used for the payment of Medicaid claims.
In accordance with the priorities of this section, any requested funds not
already an ongoing appropriation in fiscal year 2026 shall be presented in
the Legislative Budget Book as a request for new onetime appropriation in the
Idaho Millennium Fund Program and not in the respective agency budgets. Con-
sistent with Section 67-1806, Idaho Code, the Joint Millennium Fund Commit-
tee shall be responsible for the official recommendation on the uses of the
Idaho Millennium Income Fund.
SECTION 13. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 14. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 211, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Juvenile Corrections for the Com-
munity, Operations, and Program Services Program $1,291,000 from the Idaho
Millennium Income Fund to be expended for trustee and benefit payments for
the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 15. YOUTH ASSESSMENT CENTERS. (1) Any moneys appropriated from
the Idaho Millennium Income Fund to the Department of Juvenile Corrections
for youth assessment centers shall be considered a onetime appropriation
with no expectation of future financial support.
(2) In order for a youth assessment center to receive moneys from the
Idaho Millennium Income Fund, the center shall provide a detailed sustain-
ability plan that demonstrates how that center can remain operational with-


out reliance on state funds. Each plan shall include documentation stat-
ing financial commitments for ongoing financial support for the center. The
sustainability plan shall be submitted to the Department of Juvenile Cor-
rections and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Ser-
vices Office prior to the Department of Juvenile Corrections distributing
any moneys.
(3) Funding shall be distributed to eligible youth assessment centers
based on criteria set forth by the Department of Juvenile Corrections. Fund-
ing for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, shall be distributed
to eligible centers as soon as practicable. Funding for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026, shall be distributed in two distributions with
the first distribution to occur no later than July 15, 2025, and the second
distribution to occur no later than December 1, 2025. Funding determina-
tions made by the Department of Juvenile Corrections shall be considered fi-
nal.
(4) Each youth assessment center that receives moneys from the Idaho
Millennium Income Fund shall sign an attestation letter or equivalent doc-
ument that demonstrates how distributed moneys will be used in accordance
with this section and with any other applicable rule or law, that confirms
that all moneys received will be accounted for using generally accepted
accounting principles, and that demonstrates how the center will maintain
operational and fiscal accountability throughout the year. This informa-
tion shall be provided to the Department of Juvenile Corrections and the
Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office prior
to the Department of Juvenile Corrections distributing any moneys. Each
center must maintain adequate records for revenue and expenditure verifi-
cation. If a center that receives moneys from the Idaho Millennium Income
Fund ceases operations between the effective date of this section and June
30, 2026, that center shall immediately notify the Department of Juvenile
Corrections and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office and shall return all unexpended moneys to the Department of
Juvenile Corrections as soon as practicable.
(5) Each youth assessment center that receives moneys from the Idaho
Millennium Income Fund shall provide reports demonstrating the State's re-
turn on investment for moneys provided, including data-driven results on the
success of the center. A uniform report template shall be created by a coali-
tion of members that represent various youth assessment centers around the
state, and all centers shall submit reports according to the template. The
initial report shall be provided to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office and the Department of Juvenile Correc-
tions no later than September 1, 2025, and the updated report shall be sub-
mitted no later than June 1, 2026.
(6) If the Joint Millennium Fund Committee determines that an indepen-
dent audit is needed, then such an audit is required and will occur at the ex-
pense of the associated center.
(7) If any center determines that future state funding may be neces-
sary, that center shall submit a request to the Idaho Behavioral Health Coun-
cil by a date determined by the council, and such date shall be posted on the
council's website. Each youth assessment center request shall include de-
tails on the funding amount needed, intended purposes, proposed solutions to


maximize non-state resources to sustain operations on an ongoing basis, and
any other criteria determined by the Idaho Behavioral Health Council.
SECTION 16. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 14 and 15 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 13 of this
act shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.